Utah statutes.
63G-12-202.   Federal waivers, exemptions, or authorizations -- Implementation without waiver, exemption, or authorization.

(1)  The department, under the direction of the governor, shall seek one or more federal waivers, exemptions, or authorizations to implement the program.

(2)  The governor shall actively participate in the effort to obtain one or more federal waivers, exemptions, or authorizations under this section.

(3)  The department shall implement the program the sooner of:

(a)  120 days after the day on which the governor finds that the state has the one or more federal waivers, exemptions, or authorizations needed to implement the program; or

(b)  July 1, 2013.

